District of Columbia statutes.
1-137.08

Sunset.

This part shall expire on January 31, 2015.

History

Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 1089, 59 DCR 8025
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 1122, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “January 31, 2015” for “October 1, 2014.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1122 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1122 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1122 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).